Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1606
Application approval, defined.

Application approval means authorization in writing issued by the Chief Water Officer to an owner who has applied to the Chief Water Officer for permission to construct, reconstruct, enlarge, alter, breach, remove, or abandon a dam and which specifies the conditions or limitations under which work is to be performed by the owner or under which approval is granted.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 272.